Utah statutes.
10-11-2.   Notice to property owners.
It shall be the duty of such city inspector to make careful examination and
investigation, as may be provided by ordinance, of the growth and spread of
such injurious and noxious weeds, and of garbage, refuse or unsightly or
deleterious objects or structures; and it shall be his duty to ascertain the
names of the owners and descriptions of the premises where such weeds,
garbage, refuse, objects or structures exist, and to serve notice in writing
upon the owner or occupant of such land, either personally or by mailing
notice, postage prepaid, addressed to the owner or occupant at the last known
post-office address as disclosed by the records of the county assessor,
requiring such owner or occupant, as the case may be, to eradicate, or destroy
and remove, the same within such time as the inspector may designate, which
shall not be less than 10 days from the date of service of such notice. One
notice shall be deemed sufficient on any lot or parcel of property for the
entire season of weed growth during that year. The inspector shall make proof
of service of such notice under oath, and file the same in the office of the
county treasurer.
